Utah statutes.
53-2a-805.   Division to consult with legislative and judicial branch.

The Division of Emergency Management may consult with the Legislative Management Committee, the Judicial Council, and legislative and judicial staff offices to assist the division in preparing emergency succession plans and procedures.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 295, 2013 General Session

